Utah statutes.
58-75-302.   Qualifications for licensure -- Temporary license.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each applicant for licensure as a
genetic counselor under this chapter shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of having earned:
(i)  a master's degree from a genetic counseling training program that is
accredited by the American Board of Genetic Counseling or an equivalent as
determined by the division; or
(ii)  a doctoral degree from a medical genetics training program that is
accredited by the American Board of Medical Genetics or an equivalent as
determined by the division; and
(e)  meet the examination requirement for certification as:
(i)  a genetic counselor by the American Board of Genetic Counseling or the
American Board of Medical Genetics; or
(ii)  a medical geneticist by the American Board of Medical Genetics.
(2)  The division may issue a temporary license, in accordance with Section
58-1-303 and any other conditions established by rule, to an applicant who
meets all of the requirements for licensure except the examination requirement
of Subsection (1)(e).
